Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [115.544] REGULATING DISCHARGES OF GRAY WATER FROM COMMERCIAL HOUSEBOATS IN CERTAIN COUNTIES. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding this chapter, chapter 116, or any other provision of law, the Pollution Control Agency may not regulate the discharge of sewage from commercial houseboats if the sewage does not contain toilet wastes and the commercial houseboats operate in St. Louis, Koochiching, or Lake County. The counties of St. Louis, Koochiching, and Lake must regulate those discharges in their respective jurisdictions. A county ordinance adopted under this section must comply with the federal Clean Boating Act of 2008 and all other applicable federal laws. new text end